Hawaii, session 2026, GM1136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 461-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the definition of "registered pharmacy
technician" to read as follows:
""Registered pharmacy technician" means a person, exclusive
of pharmacy interns and auxiliary pharmacy personnel, who is at
least sixteen years of age with a certificate of registration
issued by the board pursuant to section 461-9.5, and who may, in
addition to the tasks of an auxiliary pharmacy personnel,
perform filling, packaging, manipulative, repetitive, or other
nondiscretionary tasks [7—aftd-^feae4ts—speei-fied—ift—seetieft—4-&1—
11.4,] only while assisting and while under the supervision and
control of a registered pharmacist[—]; provided that to
administer vaccinations, the registered pharmacy technician
shall be at least eighteen years of age and meet the
requirements under section 461-11.4."
SECTION 2. Section 461-4.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
2026-2479 SB2623 CDl SMA-l.docx 1
liiniiiiiiiiiiiMiiiiiiiM

Page 2 S.B. NO. 2623
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
CD, 1
"(a) In addition to any other powers and duties authorized
by law, the board:
(1) Shall adopt, amend, and repeal rules pursuant to
chapter 91, as it deems proper for the purposes of
this chapter, Public Law 100-293, and title 21 Code of
Federal Regulations part 205;
(2) Shall examine, license, reinstate, and renew the
licenses of qualified applicants for registered
pharmacists and wholesale prescription drug
distributors; issue and renew certificates of
registration for registered pharmacy technicians; and
issue and renew permits to operate pharmacies;
(3) May require the inspection of any wholesale
prescription drug distributor premises in the State to
ensure compliance with this chapter and rules adopted
under this chapter, or may require an applicant for a
pharmacy license to submit a statement that the
premises, including but not limited to security and
sanitation, are in conformance with the board's
requirements and that the applicant possesses the
reference materials and technical clinical equipment
2026-2479 SB2623 GDI SMA-l.docx 2
MiiiiiHininiiiiiiiiniiiHiii

Page 3
S.B. NO. 2^2
C.D. 1
and supplies as may be specified in rules adopted
under this chapter;
(4) May fine, suspend, or revoke any license,
registration, or permit for any cause prescribed by
this chapter, or for any violation of the rules
adopted under this chapter, and refuse to grant or
renew any license, registration, or permit for any
cause [whieh] that would be ground for revocation or
suspension of a license, registration, or permit;
(5) May deny a license to any applicant who has been
disciplined by another state or federal agency.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a final order
of disciplinary action taken pursuant to this
paragraph shall be a matter of public record; and
(6) May approve pilot and demonstration research projects
for innovative applications in the practice of
pharmacy; provided that the projects shall not include
therapeutic substitution or substitution of a medical
device used in patient care; provided further that
nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to expand
2026-2479 SB2623 GDI SMA-l.docx 3
iiiniHiiiiiiiiiii!iniiiiiiiiii

Page 4 S.B. NO.
"“2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
the definition of "practice of pharmacy" under section
461-1. The board may also:
(A) Approve a provision that grants an exception to
any rule adopted under this paragraph;
(B) Extend the time an exception to a rule is
granted, as may be necessary for the board to
adopt an amendment or modification to the rule;
(C) Condition approval of a project upon compliance
with this section and any rules adopted under
this section; and
(D) Rescind approval and terminate a project if, at
any time, a project fails to protect public
health or welfare."
SECTION 3. Section 461-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows;
"(a) All licenses, certificates of registration, and
permits issued by the board, except temporary licenses issued
under section 461-7, shall be renewed biennially on or before
December 31 of each odd-numbered year. Failure to pay the
biennial fee and to satisfy the continuing education requirement
on or before December 31 of each odd-numbered year, shall
2026-2479 SB2623 CDl SMA-l.docx
IIHBIHmillHlilMOIIilBIIH

Page 5
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
constitute a forfeiture of the license as of the date of
expiration. Failure to pay the biennial fee on or before
December 31 of each odd-numbered year shall constitute a
forfeiture of the certificate of registration or permit as of
the date of expiration.
(b) Any license, certificate of registration, or permit
forfeited pursuant to subsection (a) may be restored within
three years upon payment of any penalty fee, the current
biennial fees, and the renewal fee for the next biennium, if
applicable, upon submission of proof of compliance with the
continuing education requirement for the prior biennium, and
upon meeting any other requirements specified in rules adopted
pursuant to chapter 91[—]; provided that for certificates of
registration for pharmacy technicians, the board shall not
require proof of continuing education."
SECTION 4. Section 461-9.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) Each certificate of registration shall be valid
through December 31 of each odd-numbered year[7—upon which tho
rogistration shall lopoo and a new rogiotration shall be
required]."
2026-2479 SB2623 CDl SMA-l.docx
■HiiiiiiiniiiiniiiiiMiiM

Page 6 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2479 SB2623 CDl SMA-l.docx 6
llllllllllll■NnlllllllH^

2623
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 26th day of May ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2623, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 1,2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
28-26

SB No. 2623, SD 2, HD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
—
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives